Utah statutes.
76-6-201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  "Building," in addition to its ordinary meaning, means any watercraft, aircraft, trailer, or other structure or vehicle adapted for overnight accommodation of persons or for carrying on business and includes:

(i)  each separately secured or occupied portion of the structure or vehicle; and

(ii)  each structure appurtenant to or connected with the structure or vehicle.

(b)  "Building" does not include a railroad car.

(2)  "Dwelling" means a building which is usually occupied by a person lodging in the building at night, whether or not a person is actually present.

(3)  "Enter or remain unlawfully" means a person enters or remains in or on any premises when:

(a)  at the time of the entry or remaining, the premises or any portion of the premises are not open to the public; and

(b)  the actor is not otherwise licensed or privileged to enter or remain on the premises or any portion of the premises.

(4)  "Enter" means:

(a)  intrusion of any part of the body; or

(b)  intrusion of any physical object under control of the actor.

(5)  "Railroad car":

(a)  in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes a sleeping car or any container or trailer that is on a railroad car; and

(b)  includes only a railroad car that is operable and part of an ongoing railroad operation.

